Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB430.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Military Installation Training and Operations Preservation Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Clearinghouse." The Military Aviation and Installation Assurance Siting Clearinghouse."Department." The Department of Environmental Protection of the Commonwealth."DETERMINATION." THE FINDINGS OF A REVIEW.<--1234567891011121314151617 "REVIEW." A FORMAL REVIEW OF MISSION COMPATIBILITY CONDUCTED BY THE CLEARINGHOUSE."Wind turbine." A wind turbine or collection of wind turbines that require notice to be provided to the Federal Aviation Administration under 14 CFR 77.9 (relating to construction or alteration requiring notice)."Wind turbine owner." A person or entity that plans to construct or install a wind turbine in this Commonwealth.Section 3. Prohibition.A wind turbine owner may not engage in the construction, installation or expansion of a wind turbine unless the wind turbine owner has received written notification from the clearinghouse that the proposed project will not have an adverse impact on military operations and readiness or that the proposed project will not result in an unacceptable risk to the national security of the United States.SECTION 3. DETERMINATION REQUIRED.(A) NOTICE.--PRIOR TO APPLYING TO THE DEPARTMENT FOR A PERMIT OR AUTHORIZATION, A WIND TURBINE OWNER MUST SUBMIT NOTICE TO THE FEDERAL AVIATION ADMINISTRATION UNDER 14 CFR 77.9 (RELATING TO CONSTRUCTION OR ALTERATION REQUIRING NOTICE), INCLUDING A REVIEW.(B) DISTRIBUTION OF COPIES OF DETERMINATION.--UPON RECEIPT OF A DETERMINATION FROM THE CLEARINGHOUSE, THE WIND TURBINE OWNER SHALL PROVIDE AN ORIGINAL COPY OF THE DETERMINATION TO THE DEPARTMENT AND TRANSMIT AN ADDITIONAL COPY OF THE DETERMINATION TO THE ADJUTANT GENERAL OF PENNSYLVANIA.Section 4. Department notification.The (A) ISSUANCE OF PERMIT.--SUBJECT TO SUBSECTIONS (B) AND (C), THE department may not issue a required permit or 20250HB0430PN0988 - 2 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 authorization under the laws of this Commonwealth regarding the construction, installation or expansion of a proposed wind turbine unless the department receives the required written notification provided by the clearinghouse DETERMINATION under section 3.(B) LIMITATION.--THE DEPARTMENT MAY NOT ISSUE THE REQUIRED PERMIT OR AUTHORIZATION IF THE DETERMINATION FINDS THAT THE PROPOSED WIND TURBINE WOULD:(1) HAVE AN ADVERSE IMPACT ON MILITARY OPERATIONS AND READINESS; OR(2) RESULT IN AN UNACCEPTABLE RISK TO THE NATIONAL SECURITY OF THE UNITED STATES.(C) EXCEPTION.--NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTION (B), THE DEPARTMENT MAY ISSUE A REQUIRED PERMIT OR AUTHORIZATION IF THE WIND TURBINE OWNER PROVIDES PROOF TO THE DEPARTMENT THAT:(1) THE CLEARINGHOUSE AND WIND TURBINE OWNER HAVE ENTERED INTO AN AGREEMENT TO MITIGATE THE ADVERSE IMPACT OR UNACCEPTABLE RISK IDENTIFIED IN THE REVIEW;(2) THE CLEARINGHOUSE DETERMINES THAT ANY ADVERSE IMPACT IN MILITARY OPERATIONS AND READINESS IS SUFFICIENTLY ATTENUATED THAT IT DOES NOT REQUIRE MITIGATION; OR(3) THE CLEARINGHOUSE HAS NOT ISSUED A DETERMINATION OF ADVERSE IMPACT OR UNACCEPTABLE RISK TO NATIONAL SECURITY WITHIN 180 DAYS OF THE WIND TURBINE OWNER'S SUBMISSION FOR A REVIEW.Section 5. Applicability.This act shall apply to a wind turbine that commences operations SEEKS A REQUIRED PERMIT OR AUTHORIZATION FROM THE DEPARTMENT on or after the effective date of this section, regardless of the status of any other of the wind turbine's 20250HB0430PN0988 - 3 - <--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 permits or authorizations required under the laws of this Commonwealth. A wind turbine owner that will commence operations on or after the effective date of this section shall obtain the written notification from the clearinghouse prior to commencing operations.SECTION 6. CONSTRUCTION.THIS ACT SHALL NOT BE CONSTRUED TO INVALIDATE ANY REQUIRED PERMIT OR AUTHORIZATION ISSUED OR GRANTED BY THE DEPARTMENT BEFORE THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SECTION.Section 6 7. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately IN 180 DAYS.20250HB0430PN0988 - 4 - <--<--<--<--1234567891011